Maryland, session 2025, SB0469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 41. MARYLAND REPARATIONS COMMISSION.
9–4101.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE MARYLAND REPARATIONS
COMMISSION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0469*

SENATE BILL 469
9–4102.
THERE IS A MARYLAND REPARATIONS COMMISSION.
9–4103.
(A) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF:
(1) THE STATE ARCHIVIST, OR A PERSON WITH EXPERTISE IN FAMILY
HISTORY WHO IS DESIGNATED BY THE STATE ARCHIVIST;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL SOCIETY,
DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL SOCIETY;
(3) ONE MEMBER OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION FOR THE
ADVANCEMENT OF COLORED PEOPLE, DESIGNATED BY THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION FOR THE ADVANCEMENT OF COLORED PEOPLE MARYLAND STATE
CONFERENCE PRESIDENT;
(4) ONE MEMBER OF THE GREATER BALTIMORE URBAN LEAGUE,
DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE GREATER BALTIMORE URBAN LEAGUE;
(5) ONE VOLUNTEER EMPLOYEE OF THE HARRIET TUBMAN MUSEUM
AND EDUCATION CENTER, DESIGNATED BY THE CITY COUNCIL OF CAMBRIDGE;
(6) ONE MEMBER OF THE REGINALD F. LEWIS MUSEUM OF
MARYLAND AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE, DESIGNATED BY THE
BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE MUSEUM;
(7) FIVE MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(8) TWO MARYLAND RESIDENTS WHO ARE BUSINESS OWNERS,
SELECTED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS;
(9) THREE REPRESENTATIVES OF COMMUNITIES WITH HIGH
MINORITY POPULATIONS, SELECTED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE BLACK
CAUCUS; AND
(10) TWO EMPLOYEES OF HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES IN THE
STATE WHO HAVE EXPERTISE IN THE HISTORY OF SLAVERY, SELECTED BY THE
MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS.

SENATE BILL 469 3
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL SELECT FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS A CHAIR
AND A VICE CHAIR.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER APPOINTED OR SELECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(7), (8), (9), OR (10) OF THIS SECTION IS 2 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS APPOINTED OR SELECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(7), (8), (9), OR (10) OF THIS SECTION ARE STAGGERED AS
REQUIRED BY THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(D) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(E) THE STATE ARCHIVES SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
9–4104.
(A) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO DEVELOP AND
ADMINISTER A PROGRAM FOR THE PROVISION OF COMPENSATORY BENEFITS TO
DESCENDANTS OF INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE.
(2) COMPENSATORY BENEFITS PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY
INCLUDE SCHOLARSHIPS TO BE USED AT ANY COMMUNITY COLLEGE OR
UNDERGRADUATE, GRADUATE, OR PROFESSIONAL SCHOOL IN THE STATE.
(B) ANY INDIVIDUAL WHOSE ANCESTORS WERE ENSLAVED IN THE STATE
SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS ADMINISTERED BY THE COMMISSION.
9–4105.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP:
(I) AN APPLICATION FORM TO BE USED BY INDIVIDUALS
APPLYING FOR BENEFITS THAT ALLOWS THE APPLICANT TO INCLUDE EVIDENCE
THAT THE APPLICANT IS DESCENDED FROM INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE;
AND

SENATE BILL 469
(II) A PROCESS FOR APPROVING APPLICATIONS FOR BENEFITS.
(2) THE FORM REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE A NOTICE THAT ANY INFORMATION SUBMITTED WITH
THE FORM MAY BE SHARED WITH STATE AGENCIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PROCEDURES ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT COMMON PROCEDURES FOR
EVALUATING EVIDENCE SUBMITTED IN CONJUNCTION WITH APPLICATIONS FOR
BENEFITS UNDER THE PROGRAM AND DETERMINING WHETHER APPLICANTS ARE
DESCENDED FROM INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY SEEK THE ASSISTANCE OF STATE
AGENCIES IN:
(I) DEVELOPING THE PROCEDURES REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) EVALUATING EVIDENCE SUBMITTED IN CONJUNCTION WITH
AN APPLICATION FOR BENEFITS.
(3) TO THE EXTENT AUTHORIZED BY LAW, STATE AGENCIES SHALL
ASSIST THE COMMISSION IN EVALUATING EVIDENCE WHEN THE COMMISSION
REQUESTS ASSISTANCE.
9–4106.
(A) (1) ANY APPLICANT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION TO BE
DESCENDED FROM INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE SHALL BE PAID A CASH
SUM DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(2) IN CALCULATING THE CASH PAYMENT REQUIRED TO BE PAID
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER THE LENGTH AND
CONDITIONS OF THE ENSLAVEMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR INDIVIDUALS FROM
WHOM THE APPLICANT IS DESCENDED.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL REIMBURSE ANY APPLICANT DETERMINED TO
BE DESCENDED FROM INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE FOR ANY TUITION
PAYMENT THE APPLICANT MAKES TO ANY INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN
THE STATE.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL COOPERATE WITH BANKING INSTITUTIONS
AND STATE AGENCIES TO ASSIST ANY APPLICANT DETERMINED TO BE DESCENDED

SENATE BILL 469 5
FROM INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE IN APPLYING FOR AND RECEIVING
LOANS WITH LOW COLLATERAL AND INTEREST RATES TO THE EXTENT AUTHORIZED
BY LAW.
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL COOPERATE WITH BANKING INSTITUTIONS TO
ASSIST ANY APPLICANT DETERMINED TO BE DESCENDED FROM INDIVIDUALS
ENSLAVED IN THE STATE IN APPLYING FOR AND RECEIVING MORTGAGES WITH LOW
INTEREST RATES TO THE EXTENT AUTHORIZED BY LAW.
9–4107.
FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL
BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION IN AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING ANY MONEY REQUIRED TO BE PAID
TO APPLICANTS THE COMMISSION DETERMINES TO BE DESCENDED FROM
INDIVIDUALS ENSLAVED IN THE STATE.
9–4108.
THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Maryland Reparations Commission shall expire as follows:
(1) six members in 2026; and
(2) six members in 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that private businesses and organizations in the State that have benefited from
the institution of slavery work proactively with the Commission to provide funds and
avenues for compensation for people determined to be descended from individuals enslaved
in the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.